Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.416

Grain indemnity fund program—Assessments.

(1) Every licensed warehouse and grain dealer and every applicant for any such license shall pay assessments to the department for deposit in the grain indemnity fund according to the provisions of RCW 22.09.405 through 22.09.471 and rules promulgated by the department to implement this chapter.

(2) The rate of the assessments shall be established by rule, provided however, that no single assessment against a licensed warehouse or grain dealer or applicant for any such license shall exceed five percent of the bond amount that would otherwise have been required of such grain dealer, warehouse operator, or license applicant under RCW 22.09.090.

[ 2011 c 336 s 629; 1987 c 509 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.